Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6597YH (1) 91 je/js H.F. 2456 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 91D.2 Minimum wage ââ persons with 1 disabilities. 2 1. On or after July 1, 2027, an employer shall not, pursuant 3 to 29 U.S.C. Â§214(c), pay an employee less than the minimum 4 wage provided in this chapter. 5 2. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 6 shall engage in outreach to make employers of persons with 7 disabilities in this state aware of the requirements of this 8 section. 9 3. Subsection 1 does not apply to a nonprofit organization 10 operating a sheltered workshop as otherwise provided by law. 11 For purposes of this subsection, ânonprofit organizationâ means 12 a nonprofit entity that is exempt from federal income taxation 13 pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 14 This subsection is repealed July 1, 2028. 15 Sec. 2. Section 216C.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. To ensure full participation in 18 the social and economic life of this state by persons with 19 disabilities, it is declared to be the policy of the state 20 of Iowa that competitive and integrated employment shall be 21 considered the first and preferred option when serving persons 22 with disabilities who are of working age to obtain employment. 23 This policy applies to programs and services that provide 24 services and support to help obtain employment for persons with 25 disabilities. All state agencies shall follow this policy and 26 ensure that it is effectively implemented in their programs 27 and services. This subsection shall not be construed to 28 require any employer to give preference to hiring persons with 29 disabilities. 30 Sec. 3. Section 216C.1A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 31 following new subsections: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. âCompetitive employmentâ means work in 33 the competitive labor market that is performed on a full-time 34 or part-time basis in an integrated setting and for which an 35 -1- LSB 6597YH (1) 91 je/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2456 individual is compensated at or above the minimum wage provided 1 in chapter 91D, but not less than the customary wage and level 2 of benefits paid by the employer for the same or similar work 3 performed by individuals who are not disabled. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âIntegrated settingâ means, with 5 respect to an employment outcome, a setting typically found 6 in the community in which applicants or eligible individuals 7 interact with nondisabled individuals, other than nondisabled 8 individuals who are providing services to those applicants 9 or eligible individuals, to the same extent that nondisabled 10 individuals in comparable positions interact with other 11 persons. 12